Washington statutes.
RCW 19.91.300

Cigarettes—Sales below cost prohibited.

No person licensed to sell cigarettes under chapter 82.24 RCW may sell cigarettes below the actual price paid. Violations of this section constitute unfair or deceptive acts or practices under the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1986 c 321 s 13.]

NOTES:

Policy—Intent—Savings—Effective date—1986 c 321: See notes following RCW 82.24.500.